Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HONG DE WU GUAN; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Hong De Wu Guan to create cultural arts projects like Lion Dance for after-school programs for youth. new text end